Oklahoma, session 2026, SB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Secure
Roads and Safe Trucking Act of 2025”.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-111, as
last amended by Section 46, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-111), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-111. A. 1. Service Oklahoma shall, upon payment of
the required fee, issue to every applicant qualifying therefor a
Class A, B, C or D driver license or identification card as applied
for, which license or card shall bear thereon a distinguishing
alphanumeric identification assigned to the licensee or cardholder,
date of issuance and date of expiration of the license or card, the
full legal name, signature or computerized signature, date of birth,
residence address, unless specified as an exception in the Code of
Federal Regulations per 6 C.F.R., Section 37.17, sex, a computerized
color image of the licensee or cardholder taken in accordance with
Service Oklahoma rules and security features as determined by
Service Oklahoma. The image shall depict a full front unobstructed
view of the entire face of the licensee or cardholder; provided, a
commercial learner permit shall not bear the image of the licensee.
When any person is issued both a driver license and an
identification card, Service Oklahoma shall ensure the information
on both the license and the card are the same, unless otherwise
provided by law.
2. A driver license or identification card issued by Service
Oklahoma on or after March 1, 2004, shall bear thereon the county of
residence of the licensee or cardholder.
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 2

3. Service Oklahoma may cancel the distinguishing number, when
that distinguishing number is another person’s Social Security
number, assign a new distinguishing alphanumeric identification, and
issue a new license or identification card without charge to the
licensee or cardholder.
4. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules for inclusion of the
height and a brief description of the licensee or cardholder on the
face of the card or license identifying the licensee or cardholder
as deaf or hard-of-hearing.
5. It is unlawful for any person to apply, adhere, or otherwise
attach to a driver license or identification card any decal,
sticker, label, or other attachment. Any law enforcement officer is
authorized to remove and dispose of any unlawful decal, sticker,
label, or other attachment from the driver license of a person. The
law enforcement officer, the employing agency of the officer,
Service Oklahoma, and the State of Oklahoma shall be immune from any
liability for any loss suffered by the licensee, cardholder, or the
owner of the decal, sticker, label, or other attachment caused by
the removal and destruction of the decal, sticker, label, or other
attachment.
6. Service Oklahoma may develop by rule a procedure which
complies with the provisions of subsection G of Section 6-101 of
this title whereby a person may apply for a renewal or replacement
Oklahoma Class D license or Oklahoma identification card.
B. 1. Service Oklahoma may issue or authorize the issuance of
a temporary permit or license to an applicant for a driver license
permitting such applicant to operate a motor vehicle while Service
Oklahoma is completing its investigation and determination of all
facts relative to such applicant’s privilege to receive a license,
or while a permanent driver license is being produced and delivered
to the applicant. Such permit or license must be in the immediate
possession of the driver while operating a motor vehicle, and it
shall be invalid when the applicant’s permanent driver license has
been issued and delivered or for good cause has been refused.
2. Service Oklahoma may issue or authorize the issuance of a
temporary identification card to an applicant, permitting the holder
the privileges otherwise granted by identification cards, while a
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 3

permanent driver license is being provided and delivered to the
applicant. Such card shall be invalid when the applicant’s
permanent identification card has been issued and delivered, or for
good cause has been refused.
C. 1. Service Oklahoma may issue a restricted commercial
driver license to drivers eighteen (18) years of age or older for
any of the following specific farm-related service industries:
a. farm retail outlets and suppliers,
b. agri-chemical businesses,
c. custom harvesters, and
d. livestock feeders.
The applicant shall have held a valid driver license for at
least one (1) year. Applicants with more than two (2) years of
driving experience shall have a good driving record for the most
recent two (2) year two-year period and shall meet all the
requirements for a commercial driver license. The restricted
commercial driver license shall not exceed the maximum total days
that federal law allows. Applicants for the restricted commercial
driver license shall be exempt from the knowledge and skills test.
Application of the restricted commercial driver license does not
have to be used in consecutive days. The use of the permit shall be
declared at application.
2. A “good driving record” as used in this subsection shall
mean an applicant:
a. has not had more than one license,
b. has not had any license suspended, revoked, or
canceled,
c. has not had any conviction for any type of
disqualifying offenses or serious traffic violations,
or
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 4

d. has not had any conviction for a violation of state or
local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control,
other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with any traffic accident and has no record of an
accident in which they are he or she is at fault.
3. The restricted commercial driver license shall not be valid
for operators of commercial motor vehicles beyond one hundred fifty
(150) miles from the place of business or the farm currently being
served. Such license shall be limited to Class B or C vehicles.
Holders of such licenses who transport hazardous materials which are
required to be placarded shall be limited to the following:
a. diesel fuel in quantities of one thousand (1,000)
gallons or less,
b. liquid fertilizers in vehicles with total capacities
of three thousand (3,000) gallons or less, and
c. solid fertilizers that are not mixed with any organic
substance.
No other placarded hazardous materials shall be transported by
holders of such licenses.
D. 1. Service Oklahoma may issue a non-domiciled commercial
learner permit or a non-domiciled commercial driver license.
2. A person applying for such permit or license must comply
with all testing and licensing requirements in accordance with
applicable federal regulations, state laws, and Service Oklahoma
rules. The expiration of the issued license shall be valid until
the same date as the expiration of the visa for the non-domiciled
worker. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules for the
implementation of the process to carry out the provisions of this
section.
3. A person holding a non-domiciled commercial driver license
or non-domiciled commercial learner’s permit within this state shall
also possess a valid work visa and provide proof of citizenship to
validate his or her identity while operating a commercial motor
vehicle. Proof of citizenship shall be demonstrated through
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 5

presentation of a birth certificate, naturalization certificate, or
valid passport.
4. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be in
violation of this subsection shall be subject to a fine in the
amount of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for each violation.
The proceeds of any penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph
shall be deposited in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund
created in Section 1167 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
5. A driver found to be in violation of this subsection shall
be prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this
state until such a time that the driver is able to meet the
identification provisions of this subsection. Any driver found to
be operating a motor vehicle within this state while under such
prohibition shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days,
or by both such fine and imprisonment. Any fine collected pursuant
to the provisions of this paragraph shall be deposited to the Trauma
Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2530.9 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
6. The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the
location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation,
and, upon payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver
who meets all requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle
within this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the
commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine or
present such driver within twelve (12) hours after notification, the
owner of any cargo being transported by the commercial motor vehicle
shall be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the
cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state nor the owner of such
cargo shall be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such
cargo.
7. As used in this subsection, a non-domiciled commercial
driver license or non-domiciled commercial learner permit shall have
the same meaning as that provided in 49 C.F.R., Section 383.5.
E. 1. Service Oklahoma shall develop a procedure whereby a
person applying for an original, renewal or replacement Class A, B,
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 6

C or D driver license or identification card who is required to
register as a convicted sex offender with the Department of
Corrections pursuant to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act and who the Department of Corrections designates as
an aggravated or habitual offender pursuant to subsection J of
Section 584 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be issued a
license or card bearing the words “Sex Offender”.
2. Service Oklahoma shall notify every person subject to
registration under the provisions of Section 1-101 et seq. of this
title who holds a current Class A, B, C or D driver license or
identification card that such person is required to surrender the
license or card to Service Oklahoma within one hundred eighty (180)
days from the date of the notice.
3. Upon surrendering the license or card for the reason set
forth in this subsection, application may be made with Service
Oklahoma for a replacement license or card bearing the words “Sex
Offender”.
4. Failure to comply with the requirements set forth in such
notice shall result in cancellation of the person’s license or card.
Such cancellation shall be in effect for one (1) year, after which
time the person may make application with Service Oklahoma for a new
license or card bearing the words “Sex Offender”. Continued use of
a canceled license or card shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall,
upon conviction thereof, be punishable by a fine of not less than
Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), nor more than Two Hundred Dollars
($200.00). When an individual is no longer required to register as
a convicted sex offender with the Department of Corrections pursuant
to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, the
individual shall be eligible to receive a driver license or
identification card which does not bear the words “Sex Offender”.
F. Nothing in subsection E of this section shall be deemed to
impose any liability upon or give rise to a cause of action against
any employee, agent or official of the Department of Corrections for
failing to designate a sex offender as an aggravated or habitual
offender pursuant to subsection J of Section 584 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 7

G. A person subject to an order for the installation of an
ignition interlock device shall be required by Service Oklahoma to
submit his or her driver license for a replacement. The replacement
driver license shall bear the words “Interlock Required” and such
designation shall remain on the driver license for the duration of
the order requiring the ignition interlock device. The replacement
license shall be subject to the same expiration and renewal
procedures provided by law. Upon completion of the requirements for
the interlock device, a person may apply for a replacement driver
license.
H. Service Oklahoma shall develop a procedure whereby a person
applying for an original, renewal or replacement Class D driver
license who has been granted modified driving privileges under this
title shall be issued a Class D driver license which identifies the
license as a modified license.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-126.1 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any person operating any commercial motor vehicle, as
defined in Section 1-107.1 et. seq of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, in this state shall possess either:
1. A valid commercial driver license issued by a state,
territory, or possession of the United States, the District of
Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or
2. A valid commercial driver license issued by a state,
territory, district, or province of Canada or Mexico, or another
nation or territory that has a reciprocal license agreement with
this state, accompanied by a valid work visa. A person holding such
a driver license shall also possess a physical copy of such license
and verifiable proof of citizenship of the country that issued the
license. Proof of citizenship shall be demonstrated through
presentation of a birth certificate, naturalization certificate, or
valid passport.
B. 1. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be
in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine in the
amount of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for each violation.
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 8

The proceeds of any penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph
shall be deposited in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund
created in Section 1167 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. A driver found to be in violation of this section shall be
prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this
state until such a time that the driver is able to meet the
identification provisions of this section. Any driver found to be
operating a motor vehicle within this state while under such
prohibition shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days,
or both such fine and imprisonment. Any fine collected pursuant to
the provisions of this paragraph shall be deposited to the Trauma
Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2530.9 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the
location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation,
and, upon payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver
who meets all requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle
within this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the
commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine or
present such driver within twelve (12) hours after notification, the
owner of any cargo being transported by the commercial motor vehicle
shall be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the
cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state nor the owner of such
cargo shall be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such
cargo.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-126.2 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An operator of a commercial motor vehicle within this state
shall be able to demonstrate proficiency of the English language
sufficient to:
1. Converse with the general public;
2. Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English
language;
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 9

3. Respond to official inquiries; and
4. Make entries on reports and records.
B. 1. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be
in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine in the
amount of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for each violation.
The proceeds of any penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph
shall be deposited in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund
created in Section 1167 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. A driver found to be in violation of this section shall be
prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this
state until such a time that the driver is able to meet the
identification provisions of this section. Any driver found to be
operating a motor vehicle within this state while under such
prohibition shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days,
or both such fine and imprisonment. Any fine collected pursuant to
the provisions of this paragraph shall be deposited to the Trauma
Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2530.9 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the
location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation,
and, upon payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver
who meets all requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle
within this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the
commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine or
present such driver within twelve (12) hours after notification, the
owner of any cargo being transported by the commercial motor vehicle
shall be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the
cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state nor the owner of such
cargo shall be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such
cargo.
C. Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle found to be in
violation of this section shall, in addition to the provisions
provided for in subsection B of this section, be subject to a
penalty of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). Any fine collected
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 10

pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited to
the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-
2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 11

Passed the Senate the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 20 Page 12